District of Columbia statutes.
29-601.07

Applicability of act to foreign and interstate commerce.

(a)

A partnership or limited liability partnership organized and existing under this chapter may conduct its business, carry on its operations, and exercise the powers granted by this chapter in any state, territory, district, or possession of the United States or in any foreign country.

(b)

It is the intent of the Council of the District of Columbia that the legal existence of limited liability partnerships organized in the District be recognized outside the boundaries of the District and that, subject to any reasonable requirement of registration, a District limited liability partnership doing business outside the District be granted full faith and credit.

(c)

The liability of partners in a limited liability partnership organized and existing under this chapter for the debts and obligations of the limited liability partnership, or for the acts or omission of other partners, employees, or representatives of the limited liability partnership, shall at all be times determined solely and exclusively by this chapter and any rules promulgated hereunder.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 33-111.06.
1981 Ed., § 41-161.6.